District of Columbia statutes.
9-1213.02

Construction or maintenance outside fire limits.

No fence, barrier, or obstruction made, in whole or in part of what is commonly called barbed wire shall be erected, constructed, or maintained within the said District of Columbia, outside of the fire limits, along the line of or in or upon any street, avenue, alley, road, or other public walk, driveway, or public or private parking without a permit therefor from the Mayor of the District of Columbia.

July 8, 1898, 30 Stat. 724, ch. 640, § 2
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
1973 Ed., § 7-1102.
1981 Ed., § 7-802.
This section is referenced in § 9-1213.03.
Highway plans, jurisdiction of mayor over roads and bridges, see § 9-101.02.